West Virginia, session 2025, HB2394.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9F. SCHOOL ACCESS SAFETY ACT. §18-9F-9a. Wearable panic alert system, "Alyssa's law". (a) The state board in conjunction with the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management shall promulgate by December 31, 2025, a legislative rule in accordance with §29A-3B-1 et seq., and if necessary may promulgate an emergency rule in accordance with that article, shall implement a wearable panic alert system, at every school in the state. (b) Each wearable panic alert system shall be capable of integrating with local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls and mobile activations and initiating a campus-wide lockdown notification. (d) Each county board shall provide each staff person in a school facility with a wearable panic alert device that allows for immediate contact with local emergency response agencies. (e) Prior to the first day of school each year, each county board shall ensure that all school facility personnel receive training on the protocol for and appropriate use of the panic alert device. (f) Each county board shall ensure that all security data within a school facility is accessible by a local law-enforcement agency and coordinate with the local law-enforcement agency to establish appropriate access protocols. Accessible security data includes cameras, maps, and access control.